Utah statutes.
9-7-508.   Donations of money or property.
(1)  A person desiring to make a donation of money, personal property, or real
estate for the benefit of a library has the right to vest the title to the
money, personal property, or real estate in the county, designated for the
benefit and purposes of the library.
(2)  The county shall hold donated personal property and real estate as
prescribed by county ordinance according to the terms of the deed, gift,
devise, or bequest of the property, and the county shall be the trustee of the
property.
